Idaho, session 2025, H0473.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 6, Title 19, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 19-626, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
19-626. MEMORANDUM OF AGREEMENT WITH IMMIGRATION AND CUSTOMS ENFORCE-
MENT. (1) As used in this section:
(a) "Enforcement and removal operations" means the directorate of
United States immigration and customs enforcement under the department
of homeland security that manages all aspects of the immigration en-
forcement process, including the identification, arrest, detention,
and removal of aliens who are subject to removal or are unlawfully
present in the United States.
(b) "Immigration and customs enforcement" means the federal law en-
forcement agency under the department of homeland security, with the
primary mission to promote homeland security and public safety through
criminal and civil enforcement of federal laws governing border con-
trol, customs, trade, and immigration.
(c) "Law enforcement agency" means any law enforcement agency of the
state or any political subdivision of the state, including the Idaho
state police and any municipal police department or county sheriff's
department.
(d) "Section 287(g) memorandum of agreement" refers to section 287(g)
of the immigration and nationality act, 8 U.S.C. 1357(g), that permits
the delegation of certain immigration enforcement functions to state
and local law enforcement agencies and that enables specially trained
state or local peace officers to perform specific functions relating to
the investigation, apprehension, or detention of noncitizens during a
predetermined time frame and under federal oversight by immigration and
customs enforcement.
(2) Each law enforcement agency in this state shall make an application
for a section 287(g) memorandum of agreement with immigration and customs
enforcement, coordinated if necessary through the nearest enforcement and
removal operations filed office, to participate in a jail enforcement model,
as a warrant service officer, or both, and to participate in any future pro-
gram or successor to an existing program.


(3) If a law enforcement agency is unable to enter into a section 287(g)
memorandum of agreement, such agency shall publish a statement declaring the
reasons for its inability to enter into the memorandum and any efforts made
to establish alternate cooperation with enforcement and removal operations
of immigration and customs enforcement.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.